Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201571-2471
Pharmacist, defined.

Pharmacist means any person who is licensed by the State of Nebraska to practice pharmacy as defined in section 38-2837.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 15.
August 30, 2015
Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.